Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.280

Trainee real estate appraiser—Registration.

(1) The director may issue an original registration as a state-registered trainee real estate appraiser, to be valid for a term not exceeding two years together with a maximum of two renewals, which must be completed within seven years from the original date of registration, unless either period is interrupted by service in the armed forces of the United States of America. Only one of the renewals under this subsection may be issued if the trainee has failed to meet qualification standards necessary to take the written examination under RCW 18.140.100.

(2) A trainee real estate appraiser may not provide appraisal services other than through and under the direct supervision of a state-certified general real estate appraiser or a state-certified residential real estate appraiser.

[ 2019 c 51 s 4; 2005 c 339 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 51: See note following RCW 18.140.130.

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.